Illinois, session 104th, HB1212.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 235 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/235 new)7    Sec. 235. Illinois tourism tax credit.8    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 92026 and ending before January 1, 2029, each taxpayer is 10entitled to a credit against the taxes imposed by subsections 11(a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act in an amount equal to 12the eligible expenses incurred for engaging in qualified 13tourism activities by the taxpayer during the taxable year. In 14no event may the amount of the credit under this Section exceed 15$5,000 for any taxpayer in any taxable year. 16    (b) As used in this Section: 17    "Eligible expenses" means any expense that is paid or 18incurred by the taxpayer during any period of qualified travel 19and that is related to any of the following: (i) food and 20beverages; (ii) lodging; (iii) transportation; (iv) live 21entertainment events, such as sporting events; and (v) 22expenses related to attending a conference or business 23meeting.   HB1212- 2 -LRB104 05008 HLH 15036 b1    "Qualifying travel" means any travel on or after January 21, 2026 and on or before December 31, 2028 within the State of 3Illinois to a final destination that is more than 50 miles from 4the principal residence of the taxpayer, including a 5destination such as a vacation home. 6    (c) For purposes of this Section, no credit shall be 7allowed with respect to any expenses that are related to 8business expenses for which a deduction is allowed or 9allowable to a taxpayer under Section 162(a)(2) of the federal 10Internal Revenue Code. 11    (d) The Department of Revenue shall adopt any rules 12necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this 13Section. 14    (e) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce a 15taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 16credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess may 17be carried forward and applied to the tax liability for the 5 18taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax credit 19shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 20liability. If there are credits for more than one year that are 21available to offset liability, the earlier credit shall be 22applied first.  23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.